Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-791
Diverting animal from destination; unlawful; exception.

It shall be unlawful for any person to cause any animal to be diverted from the destination stated on the certificate of veterinary inspection as required by section 54-788 except by permit issued by the bureau.

Laws 1975, LB 321, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 15;

Laws 2003, LB 160, § 6.